pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Beisebol e softbol > Auxílios de treinamento para beisebol e softbol: Gaiolas para rebater para beisebol e softbol; Peças para suportes de rebatida de beisebol e softbol; Apoios de bola para rebater para beisebol e softbol; Peças de reposição para redes de rebatida de beisebol e softbol; Redes de rebatidas para beisebol e softbol; Peças de reposição para telas de arremesso de beisebol e softbol; Telas de arremesso para beisebol e softbol; Alvos de arremesso para beisebol e softbol; Pistolas de radar para beisebol e softbol; Treinadores de rebatida para beisebol e softbol; Bolas de treinamento de beisebol e softbol; Tacos de treinamento de beisebol e softbol; Acessórios para gaiolas de rebatida
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng chày & Bóng mềm > Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập bóng chày & bóng mềm: Chuồng đánh bóng tập bóng chày và bóng mềm; Bộ phận cọc đặt bóng chày và bóng mềm; Cột phát bóng tập bóng chày và bóng mềm; Bộ phận thay thế lưới tập đánh bóng chày và bóng mềm; Lưới đánh bóng tập bóng chày và bóng mềm; Bộ phận thay thế màn chắn ném bóng chày và bóng mềm; Khung lưới đánh bóng khi chơi bóng chày & bóng mềm; Mục tiêu đánh bóng khi chơi bóng chày & bóng mềm; Súng radar tập bóng chày & bóng mềm; Dụng cụ tập xoay đánh bóng chày & bóng mềm; Bóng tập bóng chày và bóng mềm; Gậy tập bóng chày và bóng mềm; Phụ kiện lồng tập đánh bóng
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 棒球和壘球 > 棒壘球投手訓練輔助用品: 棒壘球投手打擊練習用品; 棒壘球打擊座零件; 棒壘球投手打擊球座; 棒壘球打擊網替換零件; 棒壘球投手打擊網; 棒壘球投球防護網替換零件; 棒壘球投手保護網; 棒壘球投手目標; 棒壘球雷達槍; 棒壘球揮桿訓練用品; 棒壘球訓練球; 棒壘球訓練球棒; 打擊籠配件
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Baseball & Softball > Baseball & Softball Training Aids: Baseball & Softball Batting Cages; Baseball & Softball Batting Tee Parts; Baseball & Softball Batting Tees; Baseball & Softball Hitting Net Replacement Parts; Baseball & Softball Hitting Nets; Baseball & Softball Pitching Screen Replacement Parts; Baseball & Softball Pitching Screens; Baseball & Softball Pitching Targets; Baseball & Softball Radar Guns; Baseball & Softball Swing Trainers; Baseball & Softball Training Balls; Baseball & Softball Training Bats; Batting Cage Accessories
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Base-ball et softball > Aides à l'entraînement au baseball et au softball: Cages de frappeur de baseball et de softball; Pièces de tés de frappe de baseball et de softball; Tees de frappeur de baseball et de softball; Pièces de rechange pour filets de frappe de baseball et de softball; Filets de frappe pour baseball et softball; Pièces de rechange pour écrans de lanceur de baseball et de softball; Écrans de lancer de baseball et de softball; Cibles de lancer de baseball et de softball; Capteurs de vitesse de baseball et softball; Entraînement au swing de baseball et softball; Balles d'entraînement de baseball et de softball; Battes d'entraînement de baseball et de softball; Accessoires de cages de frappe
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Beyzbol ve Softbol > Beyzbol ve Softbol Eğitim Araçları: Beyzbol ve Softbol Vuruş Kafesleri; Beyzbol ve softbol vuruş standı parçaları; Beyzbol ve Softbol Vuruş Tişörtleri; Beyzbol ve softbol vuruş filesi yedek parçaları; Beyzbol ve Softbolda Vuruş Ağları; Beyzbol ve softbol atış perdesi yedek parçaları; Beyzbol ve Softbol Atış Perdeleri; Beyzbol ve Softbol Atış Hedefleri; Beyzbol ve Softbol Radar Atıcıları; Beyzbol ve Softbol Swing Çalıştırıcıları; Beyzbol ve softbol antrenman topları; Beyzbol ve softbol antrenman sopaları; Vuruş kafesi aksesuarları
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Baseball och softball > Träningshjälpmedel för baseboll och softboll: Slagburar för baseball och softball; Delar till slag-tee för baseboll och softboll; Slagtees för baseball och softball; Reservdelar till slagnät för baseboll och softboll; Slagnät för baseball och softball; Reservdelar till kastskydd för baseboll och softboll; Pitcherskärmar för baseball och softball; Pitchermål för baseball och softball; Radarpistoler för baseball och softball; Svingtränare för baseball och softball; Träningsbollar för baseboll och softboll; Träningsslagträn för baseboll och softboll; Tillbehör för slagburar
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Béisbol y sóftbol > Ayudas para el entrenamiento de béisbol y softbol: Jaulas de bateo para béisbol y sóftbol; Piezas para tees de bateo de béisbol y sóftbol; Camisetas de bateo de béisbol y sóftbol; Piezas de repuesto de redes de bateo para béisbol y sóftbol; Redes de bateo de béisbol y sóftbol; Piezas de repuesto de pantallas de pitcheo para béisbol y sóftbol; Pantallas de lanzamiento de béisbol y sóftbol; Blancos de lanzamiento de béisbol y sóftbol; Pistolas de radar de béisbol y sóftbol; Entrenadores de swing de béisbol y sóftbol; Pelotas de entrenamiento de béisbol y sóftbol; Bates de entrenamiento de béisbol y sóftbol; Accesorios para jaulas de bateo
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Baseball & Softball > Baseball- & Softball-Trainingshilfen: Baseball- & Softball-Schlagkäfige; Ersatzteile für Baseball- & Softball-Schlag-Tees; Baseball- & Softball-Batting-Tees; Ersatzteile für Baseball- & Softball-Schlagnetze; Baseball- & Softball-Schlagnetze; Ersatzteile für Baseball- & Softball-Pitching-Screens; Baseball- & Softball-Pitching-Wände; Baseball- & Softball-Pitching-Ziele; Baseball- & Softballplatten-Radarpistolen; Baseball- & Softball-Schwungtrainer; Trainingsbälle für Baseball & Softball; Trainingsschläger für Baseball & Softball; Zubehör für Schlagkäfige
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > เบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล > อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล: กรงตีเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; ชิ้นส่วนแท่นตั้งตีเบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล; แท่นตั้งตีเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; ชิ้นส่วนอะไหล่ตาข่ายฝึกตีเบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล; ตาข่ายตีเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; ชิ้นส่วนอะไหล่ฉากกั้นพิทเชอร์เบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล; ฉากขว้างลูกเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; เป้าหมายการขว้างลูกเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; ปืนเรดาร์สำหรับเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมสวิงลูกเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล; ลูกซ้อมเบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล; ไม้ซ้อมตีเบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับกรงฝึกตีเบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Bejzbal a softbal > Bejzbalové a softbalové tréningové pomôcky: Bejzbalové a softbalové odpalovacie klietky; Diely na bejzbalové a softbalové odpaľovacie stojany; Bejzbalové a softbalové odpalovacie stojany; Náhradné diely pre odpaľovacie siete na bejzbal a softbal; Bejzbalové a softbalové siete; Náhradné diely pre ochranné siete na na bejzbal a softbal; Bejzbalové a softbalové nadhadzovacie panely; Bejzbalové a softbalové nadhadzovacie terče; Bejzbalové a softbalové radary; Bejzbalové a softbalové visiace trenažéry; Bejzbalové a softbalové tréningové lopty; Bejzbalové a softbalové tréningové pálky; Príslušenstvo odpaľovacích klietok
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Beisbolas ir softbolas > Beisbolo ir softbolo treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės: Beisbolo ir softbolo mušimo narvai; Beisbolo ir softbolo mušimo stovelių dalys; Beisbolo ir softbolo mušimo stoveliai; Beisbolo ir softbolo mušimo tinklų atsarginės dalys; Beisbolo ir softbolo mušimo tinklai; Beisbolo ir softbolo metimo apsauginių tinklų atsarginės dalys; Beisbolo ir softbolo metimo tinklai; Beisbolo ir softbolo metimo taikiniai; Beisbolo ir softbolo radarai; Beisbolo ir softbolo mušimo treniruokliai; Beisbolo ir softbolo treniruočių kamuoliai; Beisbolo ir softbolo treniruočių lazdos; Mušimo narvų priedai
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 야구/소프트볼 > 야구/소프트볼 훈련 장비: 야구/소프트볼 타격 연습 케이지; 야구 및 소프트볼 배팅 티 부품; 야구/소프트볼 배팅 티; 야구 및 소프트볼 타격망 교체용 부품; 야구/소프트볼 타격 연습 그물망; 야구 및 소프트볼 피칭 스크린 교체용 부품; 야구/소프트볼 투구 연습 스크린; 야구/소프트볼 피칭 타겟; 야구/소프트볼 레이더 스피드건; 야구/소프트볼 스윙 트레이너; 야구 및 소프트볼 훈련용 공; 야구 및 소프트볼 훈련용 배트; 배팅 케이지 액세서리
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Mπέιζμπολ/σόφτμπολ > Εκπαιδευτικά βοηθήματα μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ: Κλουβιά προπόνησης μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Εξαρτήματα βάσεων χτυπήματος μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Βάσεις χτυπημάτων μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Ανταλλακτικά διχτυών προπόνησης μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Δίχτυα χτυπημάτων μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Ανταλλακτικά προστατευτικών διχτυών ρίψεων μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Οθόνες ρίψεων μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Στόχοι ρίψεων μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Ραδιοανιχνευτές ταχύτητας μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Εκπαιδευτές αιώρησης μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ; Μπάλες προπόνησης μπέιζμπολ και σόφτμπολ; Ρόπαλα προπόνησης μπέιζμπολ και σόφτμπολ; Αξεσουάρ κλωβών προπόνησης
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Baseball ja softball > Baseball- ja softball-harjoittelun apuvälineet: Baseball- ja softball-lyöntihäkit; Baseball- ja softball-lyöntitelineiden osat; Baseball- ja softball-lyöntitiit; Baseball- ja softball-lyöntiverkkojen varaosat; Baseball- ja softball-verkot; Baseball- ja softball-syöttöverkkojen varaosat; Baseball- ja softball-syöttöverkot; Baseball- ja softball-syöttömaalit; Baseball- ja softball-tutka-aseet; Baseball- ja softball-lyöntiharjoittelun apuvälineet; Baseballin ja softballin harjoituspallot; Baseballin ja softballin harjoitusmailat; Lyöntihäkkien lisävarusteet
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Baseball și softball > Articole de antrenament pentru baseball și softball: Cuști pentru baseball și softball; Piese pentru suporturi de batting la baseball și softball; Teuri pentru baseball și softball; Piese de schimb pentru plasele de lovire la baseball și softball; Plase pentru baseball și softball; Piese de schimb pentru plasele de protecție ale aruncătorului (baseball și softball); Plase pentru aruncare baseball și softball; Ținte aruncare pentru baseball și softball; Pistoale radar pentru baseball și softball; Dispozitive antrenament aruncare pentru baseball și softball; Mingi de antrenament pentru baseball și softball; Bâte de antrenament pentru baseball și softball; Accesorii pentru cuști de antrenament
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Baseball a softball > Tréninkové pomůcky na baseball a softball: Tréninkové tunely/klece na baseball a softball; Díly pálkařských stativů pro baseball a softball; Odpalovací stojany na baseball a softball; Náhradní díly pálkařských sítí pro baseball a softball; Sítě pro odpal a nadhoz na baseball a softball; Náhradní díly nadhazovacích zástěn pro baseball a softball; Ochranné sítě pro odpal na baseball a softball; Terče pro trénování odpalu na baseball a softball; Pistolové radary pro baseball a softball; Pomůcky na baseball a softball pro trénování švihu; Tréninkové míče na baseball a softball; Tréninkové pálky na baseball a softball; Příslušenství k pálkařským klecím
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > 野球・ソフトボール用品 > 野球・ソフトボール練習器具: 野球・ソフトボール用バッティングケージ; 野球・ソフトボール用バッティングティーパーツ; 野球・ソフトボール用バッティングティー; 野球・ソフトボール用バッティングネット交換用パーツ; 野球・ソフトボール用ヒッティングネット; 野球・ソフトボール用ピッチングスクリーン交換用パーツ; 野球・ソフトボール用ピッチングスクリーン; 野球・ソフトボール用ピッチングターゲット; 野球・ソフトボール用レーダーガン; 野球とソフトボール用スイングトレーナー; 野球・ソフトボール用トレーニングボール; 野球・ソフトボール用トレーニングバット; バッティングケージアクセサリー
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Baseball og softball > Baseball og softball – træningshjælpemidler: Baseball og softball – batterbure; Dele til batting tees til baseball og softball; Baseball og softball – battertees; Reservedele til slagnet til baseball og softball; Baseball og softball – net; Reservedele til pitching-skærme til baseball og softball; Baseball og softball – pitchingskærme; Baseball og softball – pitchingmål; Baseball og softball – radarpistoler; Baseball og softball – svingtrænere; Træningsbolde til baseball og softball; Træningsbat til baseball og softball; Tilbehør til slagbure
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Bejzbol i softbol > Pomagala za trening bejzbola i softbola: Kavezi za udaranje za bejzbol i softbol; Dijelovi za držač za udaranje loptice za bejzbol i softbol; Držači za lopte za bejzbol i softbol; Rezervni dijelovi za mrežu za udarce za bejzbol i softbol; Mreža za bejzbol i softbol; Rezervni dijelovi za zaštitne mreže za bejzbol i softbol; Stalak s mrežom za bejzbol i softbol; Mete za bejzbol i softbol; Naprave za mjerenje brzine za bejzbol i softbol; Trenažeri za bejzbol i softbol; Lopte za vježbanje za bejzbol i softbol; Palice za vježbanje za bejzbol i softbol; Dodaci za kavez za udaranje za bejzbol
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Baseball e softball > Ausili per l'allenamento di baseball e softball: Gabbie per battuta di baseball e softball; Componenti per tee di battuta da baseball e softball; Magliette da battuta di baseball e softball; Componenti di ricambio per reti da battuta per baseball e softball; Reti da baseball e softball; Componenti di ricambio per schermi da lancio per baseball e softball; Schermate di lancio di baseball e softball; Obiettivi di lancio di baseball e softball; Pistole radar per baseball e softball; Scarpe da ginnastica da swing per baseball e softball; Palle da allenamento da baseball e softball; Mazze da allenamento da baseball e softball; Accessori per gabbie di battuta
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Baseball og softball > Treningshjelpemidler for baseball og softball: Slåbur for baseball og softball; Deler til slagstativ for baseball og softball; Slåpinner for baseball og softball; Reservedeler til slagnett for baseball og softball; Kastenett for baseball og softball; Reservedeler til kastenett for baseball og softball; Kasteskjermer for baseball og softball; Kastemål for baseball og softball; Radarpistoler for baseball og softball; Slåtreningshjelpemidler for baseball og softball; Treningsballer for baseball og softball; Treningsballtre for baseball og softball; Tilbehør til slagbur
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 棒球/垒球用品 > 棒球/垒球训练辅助用品: 棒球/垒球击球笼; 棒球和垒球击球座零件; 棒球/垒球击球座; 棒球和垒球击球网替换零件; 棒球/垒球击球网; 棒球和垒球投球防护网替换零件; 棒球/垒球投球屏; 棒球/垒球投球靶; 棒球/垒球雷达枪; 棒球/垒球挥杆训练器; 棒垒球训练球; 棒垒球训练球棒; 击球笼配件
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Baseball in softball > Pripomočki za vadbo baseballa in softballa: Stojala za odbijanje baseball in softball žogic; Baseball in Softball Deli za mesto odbijanja; Stojala za odbijanje baseball in softball žogic; Baseball in Softball Nadomestni deli za mrežo za odbijanje žoge; Mreže za udarjanje baseball in softball žogic; Baseball in Softball Nadomestni deli za ogrodje za metanje žoge; Ogrodja za metanje žoge za baseball in softball; Tarče za metanje za baseball in softball; Radarske pištole za baseball in softball; Pripomočki za vadbo zamaha za baseball in softball; Baseball in Softball Vadbene žoge; Baseball in Softball Vadbeni kiji; Dodatki za kletke za odbijanje
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Бейзбол и софтбол > Помощни средства за тренировки по бейзбол и софтбол: Клетки за батиране за бейзбол и софтбол; Части за стойки за удряне за бейзбол и софтбол; Уреди за слагане на топката при батиране за бейзбол и софтбол; Резервни части за тренировъчни мрежи за бейзбол и софтбол; Мрежи за удряне при бейзбол и софтбол; Резервни части за предпазни мрежи за питчинг за бейзбол и софтбол; Екрани за хвърляне при бейзбол и софтбол; Цели за хвърляне при бейзбол и софтбол; Радарни уреди оръжия за бейзбол и софтбол; Помощни средства за отработване на замаха за бейзбол и софтбол; Тенировъчни топки за бейзбол и софтбол; Бухалки за тренировка за бейзбол и софтбол; Аксесоари за клетки за батинг
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Basebol e softbol > Auxiliares de treino para basebol e softbol: Redes de rebatida para basebol e softbol; Peças de suportes de bateio para basebol e softbol; Suportes de rebatida para basebol e softbol; Peças de substituição de redes de bateio para basebol e softbol; Redes para basebol e softbol; Peças de substituição de redes de lançamento para basebol e softbol; Telas de lançamento para basebol e softbol; Alvos de lançamento para basebol e softbol; Radar para basebol e softbol; Artigos de treino de tacada para beisebol e softbol; Bolas de treino para basebol e softbol; Tacos de treino para basebol e softbol; Acessórios para gaiolas de bateio
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Baseball és softball > Baseball és softball edzéssegédek: Baseball és softball ütőketrecek; Baseball- és softball-ütőállvány-alkatrészek; Baseball és softball ütőállványok; Baseball- és softball-ütőháló cserealkatrészei; Baseball és softball ütőhálók; Baseball- és softball-dobóháló cserealkatrészei; Baseball és softball dobóképernyők; Baseball és softball dobócélok; Baseball és softball radarfegyverek; Baseball és softball lendítésoktatók; Baseball és softball edzőlabdák; Baseball és softball edzőütők; Ütőketrec-kiegészítők
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Baseball i softball > Pomoce treningowe do baseballa i softballa: Klatki do baseballa i softballa; Części do stojaków do odbijania do baseballu i softballu; Słupki do baseballa i softballa; Części zamienne do siatek do odbijania do baseballu i softballu; Siatki do baseballu i softballu; Części zamienne do ekranów ochronnych dla miotaczy do baseballu i softballu; Ekrany do baseballa i softballa; Cele do wyrzucania w baseballu i softballu; Mierniki prędkości do baseballa i softballa; Huśtawki treningowe do baseballa i softballa; Piłki treningowe do baseballu i softballu; Kije treningowe do baseballu i softballu; Akcesoria do klatek do odbijania
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Honkbal en softbal > Trainingshulpmiddelen voor honkbal en softbal: Slagkooien voor honkbal en softbal; Onderdelen voor honkbal- en softbalslagpalen; Slagpalen voor honkbal en softbal; Vervangende onderdelen voor honkbal- en softbalslagnetten; Slagnetten voor honkbal en softbal; Vervangende onderdelen voor honkbal- en softbalpitchingschermen; Werpschermen voor honkbal en softbal; Werpdoelwitten voor honkbal en softbal; Radarpistolen voor honkbal en softbal; Swingtrainers voor honkbal en softbal; Trainingsballen voor honkbal en softbal; Trainingsknuppels voor honkbal en softbal; Accessoires voor slagkooien
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Бейсбол и софтбол > Тренировочный инвентарь для бейсбола и софтбола: Закрытые площадки для отработки удара битой по мячу; Детали стоек для отбивания (бейсбол и софтбол); Подставки для мячей для бэттеров; Запасные части для сеток для отбивания (бейсбол и софтбол); Сетки для отработки удара битой по мячу; Запасные части для защитных экранов питчера; Экраны для тренировки питчеров; Мишени для тренировки питчеров; Радары для измерения скорости мяча; Тренажеры для отработки замаха битой; Тренировочные мячи для бейсбола и софтбола; Тренировочные биты для бейсбола и софтбола; Аксессуары для тренировочных клеток для отбивания